Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-1701 to 76-1741 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Time-Share Act.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 68, § 1.